Nevada, session 83, SB204.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 608 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An employer and an H-2A visa herder may agree in
writing to exclude from the wages of the H-2A visa herder:
(a) Periods for meals if the period for meals is at least one-half
hour for each meal;
(b) Periods for sleep if the period for sleep excluded from the
wages of the H-2A visa herder does not exceed 8 hours; and
(c) Any other period of complete freedom from all duties
during which the H-2A visa herder stays on the premises and
engages purely personal pursuits. To be excluded from the wages
of the H-2A visa herder pursuant to this paragraph, a period must
be of sufficient duration to enable the H-2A visa herder to make
effective use of the time.
2. If a period excluded from the wages of the H-2A visa
herder pursuant to this section is interrupted by a call to duty by
the employer, the interruption must be counted as hours worked
for which compensation must be paid.
3. An agreement made pursuant to this section may be used
to establish the total hours of employment in a pay period of an
-
*SB204*

– 3 –
H-2A visa herder in lieu of maintaining precise records of the
number of hours worked per day. The employer shall keep a copy
of the agreement and indicate in the record of wages maintained
pursuant to NRS 608.115 that the work time of the H-2A visa
herder generally coincides with the agreement. If it is found by the
parties that there is a significant deviation from the initial
agreement, a separate record must be kept for the period in which
the deviation occurs or a new agreement must be reached that
reflects the actual facts.
4. As used in this section, “H-2A visa herder” means a
temporary agricultural foreign worker who has been hired to
perform herding or production of livestock on the range under an
H-2A visa, pursuant to 20 C.F.R. §§ 655.200 to 655.235, inclusive.
Sec. 2. NRS 608.016 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.016 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 608.0195 , and
608.215 [,] and section 1 of this act, an employer shall pay to the
employee wages for each hour the employee works. An employer
shall not require an employee to work without wages during a trial
or break-in period.
Sec. 3. NRS 608.115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.115 1. Every employer shall establish and maintain
records of wages for the benefit of his or her employees, showing
for each pay period the following information for each employee:
(a) Gross wage or salary other than compensation in the form of:
(1) Services; or
(2) Food, housing or clothing.
(b) Deductions.
(c) Net cash wage or salary.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 608.215 [,] and
section 1 of this act, total hours employed in the pay period by
noting the number of hours per day.
(e) Date of payment.
2. The information required by this section must be furnished
to each employee within 10 days after the employee submits a
request.
3. Records of wages must be maintained for a 2-year period
following the entry of information in the record.
Sec. 4. NRS 608.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.180 The Labor Commissioner or the representative of the
Labor Commissioner shall cause the provisions of NRS 608.005 to
608.195, inclusive, and 608.215 and section 1 of this act to be
enforced, and upon notice from the Labor Commissioner or the
representative:
1. The district attorney of any county in which a violation of
those sections has occurred;
-
*SB204*

– 4 –
2. The Deputy Labor Commissioner, as provided in
NRS 607.050;
3. The Attorney General, as provided in NRS 607.160 or
607.220; or
4. The special counsel, as provided in NRS 607.065,
 shall prosecute the action for enforcement according to law.
Sec. 5. NRS 608.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.195 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 608.0165,
any person who violates any provision of NRS 608.005 to 608.195,
inclusive, or 608.215 [,] or section 1 of this act, or any regulation
adopted pursuant thereto, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, the Labor
Commissioner may impose against the person an administrative
penalty of not more than $5,000 for each such violation.
H
-
*SB204*